test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-ni-tsazid_wake-up_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ts'ázid[wake-up] :
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       ts'ánissíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       ts'ánízíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       ts'ázíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [ts'ániìzíd, ts'ánaàzíd]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [ts'ádàniìzíd, ts'ádànaàzíd]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       ts'ánassíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: ts'ádànassíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       ts'ágizíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: ts'ádàgizíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       ts'áts'izíd
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: ts'ádàts'izíd
